Nevada, session 83, AB417.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 482.460 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.460 1. The Department shall rescind and cancel the
registration of any vehicle which the Department determines is
unsafe, unfit to be operated or not equipped as required by law.
2. [The] Except as provided in subsection 4, the Department
shall rescind and cancel the registration of any vehicle if the
registered owner of the vehicle is issued a citation or notice of
violation pursuant to section 3 of this act or for operating a motor
vehicle in violation of subsection 2 of NRS 484D.415, unless the
owner provides, within 30 days after the citation or notice is issued,
proof to the Department that the condition for which he or she was
issued the notice or citation has been corrected.
3. Except as provided in subsection 4, the Department shall
rescind and cancel the registration of any vehicle for which it
receives an order to impound and an order to rescind and cancel
registration pursuant to subsection 5 or 8 of NRS 484B.653,
unless the registered owner within 30 days after the last date of
impound indicated on the order to impound the vehicle, proves
through an inspection in a manner prescribed by the Department
that the vehicle is:
(a) Equipped in the manner required by chapter 484D of NRS,
and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto; and
(b) Not in such an unsafe condition as to endanger the driver
or other occupant of the vehicle or any person upon a public
highway or premises to which the public has access.
4. The Department may extend the period prescribed by
subsection 2 or 3 for not more than an additional 60 days if:
(a) The vehicle is registered with the Department; and
(b) The owner of the vehicle proves to the Department that the
work is being performed that is necessary, as applicable, to:
(1) Equip the car in the manner required by chapter 484D
of NRS, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto; or
(2) Repair any unsafe condition that endangers the driver
or other occupant of the vehicle or any person upon a public
highway or premises to which the public has access.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 2. Chapter 484B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 3. 1. If a peace officer, while investigating a violation
of paragraph (b) or (d) of subsection 1 of NRS 484B.653, has
reasonable cause to believe that a vehicle used or suspected of
being used in the violation is not equipped as required by chapter
484D of NRS, or any regulations adopted pursuant thereto, or is
in such unsafe condition as to endanger the driver or other
occupant of the vehicle or any person upon a public highway or
premises to which the public has access, the peace officer shall
inspect the vehicle to determine whether the vehicle:
(a) Is not equipped as required by chapter 484D of NRS, or
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto; or
(b) Is in such unsafe condition as to endanger the driver or
other occupant of the vehicle or any person upon a public
highway or premises to which the public has access.
2. If, after performing an inspection pursuant to subsection 1,
the peace officer determines that the vehicle is in a condition
described in paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 1, the peace officer
may issue a citation to the registered owner of the vehicle.
3. A peace officer who issues a citation pursuant to
subsection 2 shall, not later than 5 days after issuing the citation,
deliver or cause to be delivered to the Department a copy of the
citation.
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. NRS 484B.653 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.653 1. It is unlawful for a person to:
(a) Drive a vehicle in willful or wanton disregard of the safety of
persons or property on a highway or premises to which the public
has access.
(b) Drive a vehicle in an unauthorized speed contest on a
highway or premises to which the public has access.
(c) Organize an unauthorized speed contest on a highway or
premises to which the public has access.
(d) Drive a vehicle in an unauthorized trick driving display on a
highway or premises to which the public has access.
(e) Facilitate an unauthorized trick driving display on a highway
or premises to which the public has access.
 A violation of paragraph (a), (b) or (d) of this subsection or
subsection 1 of NRS 484B.550 constitutes reckless driving.
2. If, while violating the provisions of subsections 1 to 5,
inclusive, of NRS 484B.270, NRS 484B.280, paragraph (a) or (c) of
subsection 1 of NRS 484B.283, NRS 484B.350, subsections 1 to 4,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
inclusive, of NRS 484B.363 or subsection 1 of NRS 484B.600, the
driver of a motor vehicle on a highway or premises to which the
public has access is the proximate cause of a collision with a
pedestrian or a person riding a bicycle, an electric bicycle or an
electric scooter, the violation constitutes reckless driving.
3. A person who violates paragraph (a) of subsection 1 is guilty
of a misdemeanor and:
(a) For the first offense, shall be punished:
(1) By a fine of not less than $250 but not more than $1,000;
or
(2) By both fine and imprisonment in the county jail for not
more than 6 months.
(b) For the second offense, shall be punished:
(1) By a fine of not less than $1,000 but not more than
$1,500; or
(2) By both fine and imprisonment in the county jail for not
more than 6 months.
(c) For the third and each subsequent offense, shall be punished:
(1) By a fine of not less than $1,500 but not more than
$2,000; or
(2) By both fine and imprisonment in the county jail for not
more than 6 months.
4. A person who violates paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection 1
or commits a violation which constitutes reckless driving pursuant
to subsection 2 is guilty of a misdemeanor and:
(a) For the first offense:
(1) Shall be punished by a fine of not less than $250 but not
more than $1,000;
(2) Shall perform not less than 50 hours, but not more than
99 hours, of community service; and
(3) May be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for
not more than 6 months.
(b) For the second offense:
(1) Shall be punished by a fine of not less than $1,000 but
not more than $1,500;
(2) Shall perform not less than 100 hours, but not more than
199 hours, of community service; and
(3) May be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for
not more than 6 months.
(c) For the third and each subsequent offense:
(1) Shall be punished by a fine of not less than $1,500 but
not more than $2,000;
(2) Shall perform 200 hours of community service; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(3) May be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for
not more than 6 months.
5. In addition to any fine, community service and
imprisonment imposed upon a person pursuant to subsection 4, the
court:
(a) Shall issue an order suspending the driver’s license of the
person for a period of not less than 6 months but not more than 2
years and requiring the person to surrender all driver’s licenses then
held by the person;
(b) Within 5 days after issuing an order pursuant to paragraph
(a), shall forward to the Department any licenses, together with a
copy of the order;
(c) For the first offense, may issue an order impounding, for a
period of 15 days, any vehicle that is registered to the person who
violates paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection 1 if the vehicle is used in
the commission of the offense; [and]
(d) For the second and each subsequent offense, shall issue an
order impounding, for a period of 30 days, any vehicle that is
registered to the person who violates paragraph (b) or (c) of
subsection 1 if the vehicle is used in the commission of the offense
[.] ;
(e) If the court issues an order for impoundment pursuant to
paragraph (c) or (d), shall require the Department to rescind and
cancel the registration of the vehicle unless the registered owner
completes an inspection of the vehicle as prescribed by subsection
3 of NRS 482.460; and
(f) Within 5 days after issuing an order pursuant to paragraph
(c) or (d) and paragraph (e), shall forward to the Department the
number of the license plate of the vehicle and the year, make and
model of the vehicle to be impounded, together with a copy of the
orders.
6. A person who violates paragraph (d) of subsection 1 is guilty
of a gross misdemeanor and:
(a) For the first offense:
(1) Shall be punished by a fine of not less than $1,000 but
not more than $1,500;
(2) Shall perform not less than 100 hours, but not more than
199 hours, of community service; and
(3) May be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for
not more than 364 days.
(b) For the second offense and each subsequent offense:
(1) Shall be punished by a fine of not less than $1,500 but
not more than $2,000;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(2) Shall perform 200 hours of community service; and
(3) May be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for
not more than 364 days.
7. A person who violates paragraph (e) of subsection 1 is guilty
of:
(a) For the first offense, a misdemeanor and:
(1) Shall be punished by a fine of not more than $1,000;
(2) Shall perform not less than 50 hours, but not more than
99 hours, of community service; and
(3) May be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for
not more than 6 months.
(b) For the second offense and each subsequent offense, a gross
misdemeanor and:
(1) Shall be punished by a fine of not less than $1,000 and
not more than $1,500;
(2) Shall perform not less than 100 hours, but not more than
199 hours, of community service; and
(3) May be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for
not more than 364 days.
8. In addition to any fine, community service and
imprisonment imposed upon a person pursuant to subsection 6 or 7,
the court:
(a) May issue an order suspending the driver’s license of the
person for a period of not less than 6 months but not more than 2
years and requiring the person to surrender all driver’s licenses then
held by the person;
(b) Within 5 days after issuing an order pursuant to paragraph
(a), shall forward to the Department any licenses, together with a
copy of the order; [and]
(c) May issue an order impounding, for a period of 30 days, any
vehicle that is registered to the person if the vehicle is used in the
commission of the offense [.] ;
(d) If the court issues an order for impoundment pursuant to
paragraph (c), shall require the Department to rescind and cancel
the registration of the vehicle unless the registered owner
completes an inspection of the vehicle as prescribed by subsection
3 of NRS 482.460; and
(e) Within 5 days after issuing an order pursuant to
paragraphs (c) and (d), shall forward to the Department the
number of the license plate of the vehicle and the year, make and
model of the vehicle to be impounded, together with a copy of the
orders.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
9. Unless a greater penalty is provided pursuant to subsection 4
of NRS 484B.550, a person who does any act or neglects any duty
imposed by law while driving or in actual physical control of any
vehicle on a highway or premises to which the public has access in
willful or wanton disregard of the safety of persons or property, if
the act or neglect of duty proximately causes the death of or
substantial bodily harm to another person, is guilty of a category B
felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison
for:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), a minimum
term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6
years and by a fine of not less than $2,000 but not more than $5,000.
(b) A minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum
term of not more than 10 years and by a fine of not less than $2,000
but not more than $5,000 if:
(1) The violation involves operating a vehicle at a rate of
speed that is 50 miles per hour or more over the posted speed limit;
or
(2) The violation is committed in an area designated as a
pedestrian safety zone or school zone or a school crossing zone.
10. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135 unless the person is subject to the penalty provided
pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS 484B.550.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Facilitate” means to plan, schedule or promote, or assist in
the planning, scheduling or promotion of, an unauthorized trick
driving display or in any other way participate in an unauthorized
trick driving display, including, without limitation:
(1) Using a vehicle to divert, slow, impede or otherwise
block traffic with the intent to enable or assist an unauthorized trick
driving display; or
(2) Filming or otherwise recording an unauthorized trick
driving display with the intent to promote an unauthorized trick
driving display.
(b) “Organize” means to plan, schedule or promote, or assist in
the planning, scheduling or promotion of, an unauthorized speed
contest on a highway or premises to which the public has access,
regardless of whether a fee is charged for attending the unauthorized
speed contest.
(c) “Trick driving display” means using a vehicle to perform
tricks, stunts or other maneuvers on a highway, or premises to which
the public has access, upon which traffic has been diverted, slowed,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
impeded or blocked to enable the performing of such tricks, stunts
or maneuvers or having such tricks, stunts or maneuvers filmed or
otherwise recorded.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)